Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GREAT LAKES AQUARIUM LAKE STURGEON PROJECT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Great Lakes Aquarium for a lake sturgeon project, in cooperation with the commissioner of natural resources, Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa, and the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, including rearing and stocking lake sturgeon and public education on the historical, cultural, and biological significance of lake sturgeon in the St. Louis River. new text end